Illinois, session 104th, SB236.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 16-30 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/16-30)7    Sec. 16-30. Identity theft; aggravated identity theft. 8    (a) A person commits identity theft when he or she 9knowingly:10        (1) uses any personal identifying information or 11    personal identification document of another person to 12    fraudulently obtain credit, money, goods, services, or 13    other property;14        (2) uses any personal identifying information or 15    personal identification document of another with intent to 16    commit any felony not set forth in paragraph (1) of this 17    subsection (a);18        (3) obtains, records, possesses, sells, transfers, 19    purchases, or manufactures any personal identifying 20    information or personal identification document of another 21    with intent to commit any felony;22        (4) uses, obtains, records, possesses, sells, 23    transfers, purchases, or manufactures any personal   SB0236- 2 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1    identifying information or personal identification 2    document of another knowing that such personal identifying 3    information or personal identification documents were 4    stolen or produced without lawful authority;5        (5) uses, transfers, or possesses document-making 6    implements to produce false identification or false 7    documents with knowledge that they will be used by the 8    person or another to commit any felony;9        (6) uses any personal identifying information or 10    personal identification document of another to portray 11    himself or herself as that person, or otherwise, for the 12    purpose of gaining access to any personal identifying 13    information or personal identification document of that 14    person, without the prior express permission of that 15    person;16        (7) uses any personal identifying information or 17    personal identification document of another for the 18    purpose of gaining access to any record of the actions 19    taken, communications made or received, or other 20    activities or transactions of that person, without the 21    prior express permission of that person; 22        (7.5) uses, possesses, or transfers a radio frequency 23    identification device capable of obtaining or processing 24    personal identifying information from a radio frequency 25    identification (RFID) tag or transponder with knowledge 26    that the device will be used by the person or another to   SB0236- 3 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1    commit a felony violation of State law or any violation of 2    this Article; or 3        (8) in the course of applying for a building permit 4    with a unit of local government, provides the license 5    number of a roofing or fire sprinkler contractor whom he 6    or she does not intend to have perform the work on the 7    roofing or fire sprinkler portion of the project; it is an 8    affirmative defense to prosecution under this paragraph 9    (8) that the building permit applicant promptly informed 10    the unit of local government that issued the building 11    permit of any change in the roofing or fire sprinkler 12    contractor.13    (b) Aggravated identity theft. A person commits aggravated 14identity theft when he or she commits identity theft as set 15forth in subsection (a) of this Section:16        (1) against a person 60 years of age or older or a 17    person with a disability; or18        (2) in furtherance of the activities of an organized 19    gang. 20    A defense to aggravated identity theft does not exist 21merely because the accused reasonably believed the victim to 22be a person less than 60 years of age. For the purposes of this 23subsection, "organized gang" has the meaning ascribed in 24Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 25Prevention Act. 26    (c) Knowledge shall be determined by an evaluation of all   SB0236- 4 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1circumstances surrounding the use of the other person's 2identifying information or document.3    (d) When a charge of identity theft or aggravated identity 4theft of credit, money, goods, services, or other property 5exceeding a specified value is brought, the value of the 6credit, money, goods, services, or other property is an 7element of the offense to be resolved by the trier of fact as 8either exceeding or not exceeding the specified value.9    (e) Sentence.10        (1) Identity theft.11            (A) A person convicted of identity theft in 12        violation of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) shall be 13        sentenced as follows:14                (i) Identity theft of credit, money, goods, 15            services, or other property not exceeding $300 in 16            value is a Class 4 felony. A person who has been 17            previously convicted of identity theft of less 18            than $300 who is convicted of a second or 19            subsequent offense of identity theft of less than 20            $300 is guilty of a Class 3 felony. A person who 21            has been convicted of identity theft of less than 22            $300 who has been previously convicted of any type 23            of theft, robbery, armed robbery, burglary, 24            residential burglary, possession of burglary 25            tools, home invasion, home repair fraud, 26            aggravated home repair fraud, or financial   SB0236- 5 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1            exploitation of an elderly person or person with a 2            disability is guilty of a Class 3 felony. Identity 3            theft of credit, money, goods, services, or other 4            property not exceeding $300 in value when the 5            victim of the identity theft is an active duty 6            member of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 7            the United States or of the Illinois National 8            Guard serving in a foreign country is a Class 3 9            felony. A person who has been previously convicted 10            of identity theft of less than $300 who is 11            convicted of a second or subsequent offense of 12            identity theft of less than $300 when the victim 13            of the identity theft is an active duty member of 14            the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of the United 15            States or of the Illinois National Guard serving 16            in a foreign country is guilty of a Class 2 felony. 17            A person who has been convicted of identity theft 18            of less than $300 when the victim of the identity 19            theft is an active duty member of the Armed 20            Services or Reserve Forces of the United States or 21            of the Illinois National Guard serving in a 22            foreign country who has been previously convicted 23            of any type of theft, robbery, armed robbery, 24            burglary, residential burglary, possession of 25            burglary tools, home invasion, home repair fraud, 26            aggravated home repair fraud, or financial   SB0236- 6 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1            exploitation of an elderly person or person with a 2            disability is guilty of a Class 2 felony. 3                (ii) Identity theft of credit, money, goods, 4            services, or other property exceeding $300 and not 5            exceeding $2,000 in value is a Class 3 felony. 6            Identity theft of credit, money, goods, services, 7            or other property exceeding $300 and not exceeding 8            $2,000 in value when the victim of the identity 9            theft is an active duty member of the Armed 10            Services or Reserve Forces of the United States or 11            of the Illinois National Guard serving in a 12            foreign country is a Class 2 felony. 13                (iii) Identity theft of credit, money, goods, 14            services, or other property exceeding $2,000 and 15            not exceeding $10,000 in value is a Class 2 16            felony. Identity theft of credit, money, goods, 17            services, or other property exceeding $2,000 and 18            not exceeding $10,000 in value when the victim of 19            the identity theft is an active duty member of the 20            Armed Services or Reserve Forces of the United 21            States or of the Illinois National Guard serving 22            in a foreign country is a Class 1 felony. 23                (iv) Identity theft of credit, money, goods, 24            services, or other property exceeding $10,000 and 25            not exceeding $100,000 in value is a Class 1 26            felony. Identity theft of credit, money, goods,   SB0236- 7 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1            services, or other property exceeding $10,000 and 2            not exceeding $100,000 in value when the victim of 3            the identity theft is an active duty member of the 4            Armed Services or Reserve Forces of the United 5            States or of the Illinois National Guard serving 6            in a foreign country is a Class X felony.7                (v) Identity theft of credit, money, goods, 8            services, or other property exceeding $100,000 in 9            value is a Class X felony.10            (B) A person convicted of any offense enumerated 11        in paragraphs (2) through (7.5) of subsection (a) is 12        guilty of a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of any 13        offense enumerated in paragraphs (2) through (7.5) of 14        subsection (a) when the victim of the identity theft 15        is an active duty member of the Armed Services or 16        Reserve Forces of the United States or of the Illinois 17        National Guard serving in a foreign country is guilty 18        of a Class 2 felony. 19            (C) A person convicted of any offense enumerated 20        in paragraphs (2) through (5) and (7.5) of subsection 21        (a) a second or subsequent time is guilty of a Class 2 22        felony. A person convicted of any offense enumerated 23        in paragraphs (2) through (5) and (7.5) of subsection 24        (a) a second or subsequent time when the victim of the 25        identity theft is an active duty member of the Armed 26        Services or Reserve Forces of the United States or of   SB0236- 8 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1        the Illinois National Guard serving in a foreign 2        country is guilty of a Class 1 felony. 3            (D) A person who, within a 12-month period, is 4        found in violation of any offense enumerated in 5        paragraphs (2) through (7.5) of subsection (a) with 6        respect to the identifiers of, or other information 7        relating to, 3 or more separate persons individuals, 8        at the same time or consecutively, is guilty of a Class 9        2 felony. A person who, within a 12-month period, is 10        found in violation of any offense enumerated in 11        paragraphs (2) through (7.5) of subsection (a) with 12        respect to the identifiers of, or other information 13        relating to, 3 or more separate persons individuals, 14        at the same time or consecutively, when the victim of 15        the identity theft is an active duty member of the 16        Armed Services or Reserve Forces of the United States 17        or of the Illinois National Guard serving in a foreign 18        country is guilty of a Class 1 felony. 19            (E) A person convicted of identity theft in 20        violation of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) who uses 21        any personal identifying information or personal 22        identification document of another to purchase 23        methamphetamine manufacturing material as defined in 24        Section 10 of the Methamphetamine Control and 25        Community Protection Act with the intent to unlawfully 26        manufacture methamphetamine is guilty of a Class 2   SB0236- 9 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1        felony for a first offense and a Class 1 felony for a 2        second or subsequent offense. A person convicted of 3        identity theft in violation of paragraph (2) of 4        subsection (a) who uses any personal identifying 5        information or personal identification document of 6        another to purchase methamphetamine manufacturing 7        material as defined in Section 10 of the 8        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act 9        with the intent to unlawfully manufacture 10        methamphetamine when the victim of the identity theft 11        is an active duty member of the Armed Services or 12        Reserve Forces of the United States or of the Illinois 13        National Guard serving in a foreign country is guilty 14        of a Class 1 felony for a first offense and a Class X 15        felony for a second or subsequent offense. 16            (F) A person convicted of identity theft in 17        violation of paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of this 18        Section is guilty of a Class 4 felony.19        (2) Aggravated identity theft.20            (A) Aggravated identity theft of credit, money, 21        goods, services, or other property not exceeding $300 22        in value is a Class 3 felony.23            (B) Aggravated identity theft of credit, money, 24        goods, services, or other property exceeding $300 and 25        not exceeding $10,000 in value is a Class 2 felony.26            (C) Aggravated identity theft of credit, money,   SB0236- 10 -LRB104 03852 RLC 13876 b1        goods, services, or other property exceeding $10,000 2        in value and not exceeding $100,000 in value is a Class 3        1 felony.4            (D) Aggravated identity theft of credit, money, 5        goods, services, or other property exceeding $100,000 6        in value is a Class X felony.7            (E) Aggravated identity theft for a violation of 8        any offense enumerated in paragraphs (2) through (7.5) 9        of subsection (a) of this Section is a Class 2 felony.10            (F) Aggravated identity theft when a person who, 11        within a 12-month period, is found in violation of any 12        offense enumerated in paragraphs (2) through (7.5) of 13        subsection (a) of this Section with identifiers of, or 14        other information relating to, 3 or more separate 15        persons individuals, at the same time or 16        consecutively, is a Class 1 felony.17            (G) A person who has been previously convicted of 18        aggravated identity theft regardless of the value of 19        the property involved who is convicted of a second or 20        subsequent offense of aggravated identity theft 21        regardless of the value of the property involved is 22        guilty of a Class X felony. 23(Source: P.A. 101-324, eff. 1-1-20.)